Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-665
Department of Health and Human Services; duties.

To implement the intent and purposes of sections 81-663 to 81-675, the department shall:

(1) Adopt and promulgate necessary rules and regulations, including rules and regulations for the frequency and form of information submitted and for standards and procedures for approving researchers;

(2) Execute contracts that the department considers necessary; and

(3) Receive and record the data obtained from the medical and health information records of persons with particular diseases or injuries.

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 3.